Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.021, is amended to read: 2.021 NUMBER OF MEMBERS. For each legislature, until a new apportionment shall have been made, the senate is composed of deleted text begin 67deleted text end new text begin 45new text end members and the house of representatives is composed of deleted text begin 134deleted text end new text begin 135new text end members. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 3, 2033, and applies to sessions of the legislature organized on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 2.031, is amended to read: 2.031 APPORTIONMENT. Subdivision 1. Legislative districts. The representatives in the senate and house of representatives are apportioned throughout the state in deleted text begin 67deleted text end new text begin 45new text end senate districts and deleted text begin 134deleted text end new text begin 135new text end house of representatives districts. Each senate district is entitled to elect one senator and each house of representatives district is entitled to elect one representative. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 3, 2033, and applies to sessions of the legislature organized on or after that date. new text end